North Carolina, session 2025, SB288.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Pauli Murray
Center for History and Social Justice for the development of the Pauli Murray Center Green. The
Green will provide functional access to the Pauli Murray Center and provide critical drainage
and stormwater management systems to the Center.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S288-v-1*